en: Safety Knee Pads
xx: Safety Knee Pads
cs: Chrániče kolen
da: Knæbeskyttere
de: Knieschoner
es: Rodilleras de seguridad
fr: Genouillères
it: Ginocchiere di sicurezza
ja: 保護用ニーパッド
nl: Kniebeschermers
no: Knebeskyttere
pl: Ochraniacze na kolana
pt: Joelheiras de segurança
ru: Защитные наколенники
sv: Knäskydd
tr: Diz Koruyucular

en: Welding Helmets
xx: Welding Helmets
cs: Svářečské kukly
da: Svejsehjelme
de: Schweißhelme
es: Caretas de soldar
fr: Masques de soudage
it: Elmetti protettivi
ja: 溶接ヘルメット
nl: Lashelmen
no: Sveisemasker
pl: Hełmy dla spawaczy
pt: Capacetes para soldagem
ru: Сварочные маски
sv: Svetshjälm
tr: Kaynak Kaskları

en: Work Safety Harnesses
xx: Work Safety Harnesses
cs: Jisticí postroje
da: Faldsikringsseler
de: Sicherungsgurte
es: Arneses de seguridad en el trabajo
fr: Harnais de protection
it: Imbragature per la sicurezza sul lavoro
ja: フルハーネス安全帯
nl: Veiligheidsharnassen
no: Personlig fallsikringsutstyr
pl: Siatki bezpieczeństwa
pt: Arneses de segurança no trabalho
ru: Рабочие страховочные привязи
sv: Säkerhetsselar
tr: İş Güvenliği Koşumları

en: Work Safety Tethers
xx: Work Safety Tethers
cs: Jisticí lana
da: Sikkerhedsfastgøring
de: Halteseile
es: Anclajes de seguridad laboral
fr: Longes de sécurité
it: Cinghie per la sicurezza sul lavoro
ja: 命綱
nl: Veiligheidslijnen voor het werk
no: Falldemperliner
pl: Uwięzie zabezpieczające
pt: Correias de segurança
ru: Рабочие страховочные фалы
sv: Säkerhetslinor
tr: Emniyet İpleri

en: Toys & Games, Toys and games
xx: Toys & Games
cs: Hračky a hry
da: Legetøj og spil
de: Spielzeuge & Spiele
es: Juegos y juguetes
fr: Jeux et jouets
it: Giochi e giocattoli
ja: おもちゃ・ゲーム
nl: Speelgoed en spellen
no: Leker og spill
pl: Gry i zabawki
pt: Brinquedos e jogos
ru: Игры и игрушки
sv: Leksaker och spel
tr: Oyuncaklar ve Oyunlar

en: Game Timers
xx: Game Timers
cs: Herní budíky
da: Tidstagere til spil
de: Spiel-Timer
es: Temporizadores para juegos
fr: Minuteurs
it: Timer per giochi
ja: ゲームタイマー
nl: Stopwatches
no: Spill-tidtakere
pl: Stopery do gier
pt: Cronômetros de jogo
ru: Игровые таймеры
sv: Tidtagarenheter till spel
tr: Oyun Kronometreleri

en: Games
xx: Games
cs: Hry
da: Spil
de: Spiele
es: Juegos
fr: Jeux
it: Giochi
ja: ゲーム
nl: Spellen
no: Spill
pl: Gry
pt: Jogos
ru: Игры
sv: Spel
tr: Oyunlar

en: Battle Top Accessories
xx: Battle Top Accessories
cs: Battling Tops – příslušenství
da: Snurretoppe til dyst – tilbehør
de: Kampfkreiselzubehör
es: Accesorios para trompos de batalla
fr: Accessoires pour jeux de toupies
it: Accessori per Battle top
ja: 対戦型コマ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor battle tollen
no: Tilbehør til snurrebassduellspill
pl: Akcesoria do gry battle tops
pt: Acessórios para pião de batalha
ru: Принадлежности для боевых волчков
sv: Battle top-tillbehör
tr: Savaş Tahtası Aksesuarları

en: Battle Tops
xx: Battle Tops
cs: Battling Tops
da: Snurretoppe til dyst
de: Battle Tops
es: Trompos de batalla
fr: Toupies de combat
it: Battle top
ja: 対戦型コマ
nl: Battle tollen
no: Snurrebassduellspill
pl: Gra battle tops
pt: Pião de batalha
ru: Боевые волчки
sv: Battle top-spel
tr: Savaş Tahtaları

en: Bingo Sets
xx: Bingo Sets
cs: Bingo
da: Bingosæt
de: Bingo-Spiele
es: Juegos de bingo
fr: Jeux de bingo
it: Set da bingo
ja: ビンゴセット
nl: Bingosets
no: Bingosett
pl: Zestawy bingo
pt: Conjunto de bingo
ru: Бинго
sv: Bingoset
tr: Bingo Setleri

en: Blackjack & Craps Sets
xx: Blackjack & Craps Sets
cs: Sady na blackjack a kostky
da: Sæt til blackjack og craps
de: Blackjack- & Würfelspiel-Sets
es: Juegos de blackjack y crap
fr: Jeux de black jack et de craps
it: Set per blackjack e dadi
ja: ブラックジャックセット
nl: Sets voor kaart- en dobbelspellen
no: Sett for tjueett og craps
pl: Zestawy do gry w blackjacka i craps
pt: Conjuntos para jogos de dados e vinte-e-um
ru: Наборы для блек-джека и крэпса
sv: Blackjack- och crapsset
tr: Yirmi Bir ve Barbut Setleri

en: Board Games
xx: Board Games
cs: Deskové hry
da: Brætspil
de: Brettspiele
es: Juegos de mesa
fr: Jeux de plateau, Jeux de société, Jeu de société, Jeux de société
it: Giochi in scatola
ja: ボードゲーム
nl: Bordspellen
no: Brettspill
pl: Gry planszowe
pt: Jogos de tabuleiro
ru: Настольные игры
sv: Brädspel
tr: Masa Oyunları

en: Card Game Accessories
xx: Card Game Accessories
cs: Karetní hry – příslušenství
da: Kortspil – tilbehør
de: Kartenspielzubehör
es: Accesorios para juegos de cartas
fr: Accessoires pour jeux de cartes
it: Accessori per giochi di carte
ja: カードゲーム関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor kaartspellen
no: Tilbehør til kortspill
pl: Akcesoria do gier karcianych
pt: Acessórios para jogos de cartas
ru: Принадлежности для карточных игр
sv: Tillbehör till kortspel
tr: İskambil Oyunu Aksesuarları

en: Card Games
xx: Card Games
cs: Karetní hry
da: Kortspil
de: Kartenspiele
es: Juegos de cartas
fr: Jeux de cartes
it: Giochi di carte
ja: カードゲーム
nl: Kaartspellen
no: Kortspill
pl: Gry karciane
pt: Jogos de cartas
ru: Карточные игры
sv: Kortspel
tr: İskambil Oyunları

en: Dexterity Games
xx: Dexterity Games
cs: Hry pro rozvoj zručnosti
da: Stablespil
de: Geschicklichkeitsspiele
es: Juegos de destreza
fr: Jeux de dextérité
it: Giochi di abilità
ja: 積み上げゲーム
nl: Behendigheidsspellen
no: Stablespill
pl: Gry zręcznościowe
pt: Jogos de destreza
ru: Игры на складывание
sv: Balanseringsspel
tr: Dizme Oyunları

en: Dice Sets & Games
xx: Dice Sets & Games
cs: Kostky
da: Terningsæt og -spil
de: Würfelsets & -spiele
es: Dados y juegos de dados
fr: Dés & jeux de dés
it: Set di dadi e giochi
ja: サイコロゲーム
nl: Dobbelstenensets en dobbelsteenspelen
no: Terningsett og -spill
pl: Kości i gry z kośćmi
pt: Conjuntos e jogos de dados
ru: Наборы костей и игры в кости
sv: Tärningsset och spel
tr: Zar Setleri ve Oyunları

en: Poker Chip Accessories
xx: Poker Chip Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pokerovým žetonům
da: Tilbehør til jetoner
de: Pokerchip-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para fichas de póquer
fr: Accessoires pour jetons de poker
it: Accessori per fiche da poker
ja: ポーカーチップ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor pokerfiches
no: Tilbehør til pokerchips
pl: Akcesoria do żetonów pokerowych
pt: Acessórios de fichas para pôquer
ru: Принадлежности для покерных фишек
sv: Pokerchiptillbehör
tr: Poker Çipi Aksesuarları

en: Poker Chip Carriers & Trays
xx: Poker Chip Carriers & Trays
cs: Kufry a stojany na pokerové žetony
da: Tasker og beholdere til jetoner
de: Behälter für Pokerchips
es: Estuches y bandejas para fichas de póquer
fr: Mallettes et racks pour jetons de poker
it: Vassoi e contenitori per fiche da poker
ja: ポーカーチップケース
nl: Koffers en trays voor pokerfiches
no: Brett og oppbevaringskofferter for pokerchips
pl: Pojemniki na żetony pokerowe
pt: Porta-fichas e bandejas para pôquer
ru: Лотки и контейнеры для покерных фишек
sv: Hållare och brickor för pokerchip
tr: Poker Çipi Taşıyıcılar ve Tepsileri

en: Poker Chips & Sets
xx: Poker Chips & Sets
cs: Pokerové žetony a sady
da: Pokerchip og -sæt
de: Pokerchips & -sets
es: Estuches y fichas de póquer
fr: Jetons et malettes de poker
it: Fiche e set da poker
ja: ポーカーチップ
nl: Pokerfiches en -sets
no: Pokersjetonger og -sett
pl: Żetony i zestawy pokerowe
pt: Fichas e jogos de pôquer
ru: Покерные фишки и наборы
sv: Pokermarker och pokerpaket
tr: Poker Fişleri ve Setleri

en: Portable Electronic Games
xx: Portable Electronic Games
cs: Přenosné elektronické hry
da: Spillekonsoller
de: Tragbare elektronische Spiele
es: Juegos electrónicos portátiles
fr: Jeux électroniques portables
it: Giochi elettronici portatili
ja: 携帯型ゲーム機
nl: Draagbare elektronische spellen
no: Bærbare elektroniske spill
pl: Przenośne gry elektroniczne
pt: Jogos eletrônicos portáteis
ru: Портативные электронные игры
sv: Portabla elektroniska spel
tr: Taşınabilir Elektronik Oyunlar